Arkansas, session 2025, HB1014.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 21, Chapter 5, Subchapter 4, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
21-5-425. In vitro fertilization coverage required.
(a) The State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program
shall include in vitro fertilization as a covered expense.
(b) After conducting appropriate studies and public hearings, the
Director of the Employee Benefits Division shall establish minimum and
maximum levels of coverage to be provided under the program for in vitro
fertilization.
(c)(1) Coverage required under this section shall include services and
procedures performed at a medical facility licensed or certified by the
Department of Health or another state health department that conform to the
guidelines and minimum standards of the:
*ANS055*
01-16-2025 15:57:26 ANS055

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1014
(A) American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists
for in vitro fertilization clinics; or
(B) American Society for Reproductive Medicine for
programs of in vitro fertilization.
(2) Continued certification is contingent upon evidence that the
medical facility is achieving a reasonable success rate for both
fertilizations and births.
(3) Appropriate laboratory facilities shall be provided by the
entity requesting certification.
(d) The director shall promulgate rules to implement this section.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Rules.
(a) When adopting the initial rules required under this act, the
Employee Benefits Division shall file the final rules with the Secretary of
State for adoption under § 25-15-204(f):
(1) On or before January 1, 2026; or
(2) If approval under § 10-3-309 has not occurred by January 1,
2026, as soon as practicable after approval under § 10-3-309.
(b) The division shall file the proposed rules with the Legislative
Council under § 10-3-309(c) sufficiently in advance of January 1, 2026, so
that the Legislative Council may consider the rules for approval before
January 1, 2026.

/s/A. Collins












01-16-2025 15:57:26 ANS055